GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/flex-rules.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:      basic rules for additional lexicon entries
# 
# LANGUAGE:     SPANISH
#
# AUTHOR:       A.Schiller
#
# CREATED:      27-May-2008
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -e "read lex LEX.lexc"  -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================



define LEX

# apostrophe
define APO [
  "\u0027"	# [']	APOSTROPHE
| "\u2018"	# [‘]	LEFT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
| "\u2019"	# [’]	RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
];


# identify tags and markers
read regex LEX ;
single char sigma net
define SIG
read regex SIG & [%+ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net
define TAG

define CHAR SIG & ? ;


define MARKER 	"[*]" | "[-]"| "(-)" | "(.)" ;

define LBD	[ "^]" ];	# lemma boundary
define CBD	[ "^=" ];	# token boundary, e.g. alla::a+Prep^=lo+Art+Def+Fem+Sg

define DEL	[ "^1" | "^2" ];	# deletion markers

define SPEC	[ LBD | MARKER ] ;

define VSimple	[a|e|i|o|u];
define VAccent	[á|é|í|ó|ú];
define Vowel	VSimple | VAccent ;

define Cons	[b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z];


# ==============================================================================
read regex [
	0 <- SPEC

# optional hyphens
.o.	%- <- [ "[-]" | "(-)" ]

# optional dots
.o.	%. <- "(.)"

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.	LEX 

# introduce lemma boundary for regular nouns/adjectives
.o.	[..] -> LBD || CHAR _ %+NAdj | %+Adj | %+Noun  

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# 
# hyphen or space
.o.	"[-]" -> [ %  | %- ]

# hyphen or nothing
.o.	"(-)" -> [ 0 | %- ]

# optional dots
.o.	"(.)" -> [ 0 | %. ]

# basic deletion rules
.o.	CHAR -> 0 	|| _ TAG* "^1"
.o.	CHAR CHAR -> 0	|| _ TAG* "^2"
.o. 	DEL -> 0 


# regular adjective/noun inflection
# feminine
.o.	o -> a		|| _ LBD $%+Fem
.o.	[..] -> a	|| Vowel Cons _ LBD $%+Fem

# plural
# italiano -> italianos; alamana -> alemanas; inglés -> ingleses
.o.	[..] -> e s	|| Vowel Cons _ LBD $%+Pl
.o.	[..] -> s	|| Vowel _ LBD $%+Pl

# accent change
# alemán -> alemana; inglés -> ingleses
.o.	á -> a,
	é -> e,
	í -> i,
	ó -> o,
	ú -> u		|| _ Cons Vowel (Cons) LBD 


# diminutives
.o.	(i|í) a @-> {ita}	|| _ %+Prop $%+Dim # Julia -> Julita, Adela -> Adelita 
.o.	(i|í) o @-> {ito}	|| _ %+Prop $%+Dim # Julio -> Julito, Pablo -> Pablito
.o.	ó n -> {oncita}	|| _ %+Prop $%+Dim # León -> Leoncita
.o.	a n -> {anito}	|| _ %+Prop $%+Dim # Juan -> Juanito



# ----------------------------------------------------------------------
# remove tags and markers
.o.	[SPEC|TAG] -> 0

	

# for place names
.o. 	{Sant} (->) S t || _ [o|a] [ %- | %  ]

];
